Massachusetts, session 194th, H1077.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 148 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 33 the following section:-
Section 33A. (a) The marshal, the department, the division or municipal officials
including, but not limited to, police, fire and building officials shall prohibit any and all public
insurance adjusters, contractors and restoration companies from engaging in any solicitation or
inspection or any physical presence on the premises under investigation until 24 hours after
either: (i) the city, town or municipal fire department; or (ii) the marshal, the department or the
division releases control of the premises back to its legal owner or occupant, unless the public
insurance adjuster, contractor or restoration company is accompanied by, or acting with,
permission of the premises’ legal owner.
(b) Any public insurance adjuster, contractor or restoration company in violation of this
provision shall be subject to a civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation and may be subject to
of 2

revocation of their license by the commissioner of insurance pursuant to section 172 of chapter
175.
of 2